Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-162
Department; powers; rules and regulations.

(1) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
insure uniform and orderly operation of the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title
Act, and the county treasurer of
each county shall conform to such rules and regulations and proceed at the
direction of the department. The department shall also provide the county treasurers with the necessary
training for the proper administration of the act.

(2) The department shall receive all instruments relating to vehicles
forwarded to it by the county treasurers under
the act and shall maintain indices covering the state at large for the instruments
so received. These indices shall be by motor number or by an identification
number and alphabetically by the owner's name and shall be for the state at
large and not for individual counties.

(3) The department shall provide and furnish the forms required by the
act, except manufacturers' or importers' certificates.

(4) The county treasurer shall
keep on hand a sufficient supply of blank forms which, except certificate
of title forms, shall be furnished and distributed without charge to manufacturers,
dealers, or other persons residing within the county.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 62;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 38.